sv: Solljus: Stark sol; Delvis skugga; Skugga; Övrigt
el: Ηλιακό φως: Γεμάτη ήλιο; Μερική σκιά; Σκιά; Άλλο
sk-SK: Slnečné svetlo: Slnečná časť; Čiastočný tieň; Tieň; Iné
ja: 日照: 十分な日光; 部分的な日陰; 日陰; その他
ro-RO: Lumina soarelui: Plin soare; Umbră parțială; Umbră; Altele
ko: 일광량: 양지; 반음지; 음지; 기타
fi: Auringonvalo: Täysi auringonvalo; Osittainen varjo; Varjo; Muu
it: Luce del sole: Pieno sole; Ombra parziale; Ombra; Altro
sl-SI: Sončna svetloba: Polno obsijano; Delno senčno; Senčno; Drugo
cs: Sluneční světlo: Na plném slunci; Částečný stín; Odstín; Jiné
lt-LT: Saulės šviesa: Tiesioginiai saulės spinduliai; Dalinis šešėlis; Šešėlis; Kita
nl: Zonlicht: Volle zon; Gedeeltelijke schaduw; Schaduw; Andere
fr: Lumière du soleil: Plein soleil; Ombre partielle; Ombre; Autre
hr-HR: Sunčeva svjetlost: Sunce; Djelomična sjena; Hlad; Ostalo
bg-BG: Слънчева светлина: Изцяло на слънце; Частична сянка; Сянка; Други
es: Luz solar: Pleno sol; Sombra parcial; Tono; Otros
tr: Güneş Işığı: Tam güneş ışığı; Kısmen gölge; Gölge; Diğer
pt-BR: Luz solar: Sem sombra; Sombra parcial; Sombreado; Outro
da: Sollys: Fuld sol; Delvis skygge; Skygge; Andet
hu: Napfény: Teljes napsütés; Részleges árnyék; Árnyék; Egyéb
vi: Ánh nắng: Nắng toàn phần; Bóng râm một phần; Bóng râm; Khác
de: Sonnenlicht: Volle Sonne; Halbschatten; Schatten; Sonstiges
nb: Sollys: Full sol; Delvis skygge; Skygge; Annet
ru: Солнечный свет: Полностью на солнце; Частично в тени; В тени; Другое
zh-CN: 阳光: 充足阳光; 部分遮荫; 背阴处; 其他
zh-TW: 陽光: 全日照; 部分遮蔭; 遮蔭; 其他
th: แสงแดด: ต้องการสัมผัสแสงอาทิตย์เต็มที่; ต้องการร่มเงาบางส่วน; ต้องการร่มเงา; อื่นๆ
pl: Promieniowanie słoneczne: Pełne słońce; Częściowy cień; Cień; Inne
pt-PT: Luz solar: Sol pleno; Sombra parcial; Tom; Outro
en: Sunlight: Full sun; Partial shade; Shade; Other